Georgia statutes. 
Sufficiency of petition. - In a suit against a municipality for wrongful death of plaintiff's husband while hauling lumber for construction of dog kennels in aid of a dog show which was being put on by his employer in the city's auditorium, petition failed to allege under what conditions the dog show was being put on, whether the show was being put on or maintained by the authority of the city in the performance of the city's governmental function, or whether the city in transporting lumber was engaged in a purely ministerial duty; thus, the petition failed to set out a cause of action. Granat v. Mayor of Savannah, 59 Ga. App. 276, 200 S.E. 311 (1938).

Roads and Bridges

General rule of law is that municipal corporation is bound to keep the municipality's streets and sidewalks in reasonably safe condition for travel in ordinary modes, by night as well as by day; and if the municipality fails to do so the municipality is liable in damages for injuries sustained in consequence. City of Rome v. Brinkley, 54 Ga. App. 391, 187 S.E. 911 (1936); Mayor of Buford v. Medley, 58 Ga. App. 48, 197 S.E. 494 (1938); McKay v. City of Atlanta, 80 Ga. App. 797, 57 S.E.2d 432 (1950).

Duty to keep sidewalks safe. - Law places upon municipality duty of keeping sidewalks safe for travel in ordinary manner. Bailey v. Wohl Shoe Co., 128 Ga. App. 372, 196 S.E.2d 677 (1973).

If city has notice of dangerous defect in sidewalk, it is the city's duty to exercise ordinary care in remedying the sidewalk or in placing safeguard about the sidewalk. City of Rome v. Brinkley, 54 Ga. App. 391, 187 S.E. 911 (1936).

Actual notice unnecessary when defect of long duration. - When a defect in a street has existed for such a length of time that the city in the exercise of ordinary diligence ought to have discovered and remedied the defect, actual notice is unnecessary. Mayor of Buford v. Medley, 58 Ga. App. 48, 197 S.E. 494 (1938).

City is liable in damages for injuries sustained by the city's failure to act, and this is true regardless of the cause of the defect, if the city knew or should have known of the defect in time to repair the defect or give warning of the defect's existence. This notice may be presumed if the defect has existed for such length of time that by reasonable diligence in the performance of their duties the proper municipal authorities could have discovered the defect, and in such event proof of actual notice is unnecessary. McKay v. City of Atlanta, 80 Ga. App. 797, 57 S.E.2d 432 (1950).

Even though the defendant city would not be liable for failure to erect signs and a barricade at an intersection (the exercise of a governmental function as charged by the court), nevertheless, it would be liable for defects in the city's streets existing for a sufficient period of time so that in the exercise of ordinary care the municipal corporation should have reasonably become aware of the defect's existence. Columbus v. Preston, 155 Ga. App. 379, 270 S.E.2d 909 (1980).

Adoption by municipality of plan to grade streets a quasi-judicial act. - Adoption by a municipal corporation of a plan for grading the streets and sidewalks of a city is a quasi-judicial act, and if the plan adopted is erroneous, the city cannot be held liable to a private person who is injured thereby. If the execution of this plan - the construction of the pavement - is unskillful or negligent, the city is liable for the construction as a ministerial duty. Rogers v. City of Atlanta, 61 Ga. App. 444, 6 S.E.2d 144 (1939).

Laying out and construction of streets a governmental function. - While it is the duty of a city to keep the city's streets and sidewalks in a safe condition for travel in the ordinary modes, by night as well as by day, the laying out and construction of city streets is a governmental function, and a city will not be liable for an injury upon the theory merely that the city had constructed and was maintaining a dangerous intersection at a place where one street entered at right angles without extending beyond another street. Lundy v. City Council, 51 Ga. App. 655, 181 S.E. 237 (1935).

Governmental immunity not in issue when defect in public road alleged. - When a bus passenger is injured when the passenger's arm, which is propped in an open bus window, is wedged between the bus window frame and a power pole installed by an electric company under a franchise agreement with a city, and the city asserts that the city granted the franchise in exercise of the city's legislative powers for which the city cannot be held liable under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1, the city's claim of governmental immunity is not the issue; the issue instead is the liability of the city under O.C.G.A. § 32-4-93 for the alleged defect in a public road in the city's municipal street system. Kicklighter v. Savannah Transit Auth., 167 Ga. App. 528, 307 S.E.2d 47 (1983).

Deciding whether to erect traffic control sign or to maintain the sign after installation is an exercise of a governmental function by a municipality and it is not liable for any negligent performance of this function. Christensen v. Floyd County, 158 Ga. App. 274, 279 S.E.2d 723 (1981).

Operation and maintenance of traffic lights and other traffic control devices is a governmental function conducted on behalf of the public safety and for the negligent performance of which municipal corporations are not liable. Such functions are not related to maintenance of the streets as such, and liability of a municipality for the negligent failure to maintain a stop sign after the sign is once erected cannot be predicated on the theory that it is a part of street maintenance. Arthur v. City of Albany, 98 Ga. App. 746, 106 S.E.2d 347 (1958); Cyr v. Mayor of Savannah, 188 Ga. App. 261, 372 S.E.2d 659 (1988).

Operation of a traffic light conducted on behalf of the public safety is a governmental function for the negligent performance of which the city is not liable. City of Rome v. Potts, 45 Ga. App. 406, 165 S.E. 131 (1932).

Stop sign. - Driver's allegations of negligence against a city for negligent maintenance of a stop sign, which was allegedly obscured by foliage, were subject to summary judgment based on the city's sovereign immunity pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(b). The driver's nuisance claim was barred because the driver failed to show the city's awareness of a problem with the stop sign. Albertson v. City of Jesup, 312 Ga. App. 246, 718 S.E.2d 4 (2011), cert. denied, No. S12C0398, 2012 Ga. LEXIS 245 (Ga. 2012).

Placement of utility pole near roadway. - City and electrical membership corporation carried the city's and corporation's burden of showing that a driver's own negligence was the sole proximate cause of the driver's collision with a utility pole located more than nine feet from the roadway; therefore, summary judgment for the city and corporation was proper. Kecskes v. City of Mt. Zion, 300 Ga. App. 348, 685 S.E.2d 329 (2009).

Setting speed limit. - Governing body of municipality, which set the speed limit challenged by an accident victim, could not be held liable for any error in judgment that body may have made in so doing. Reid v. City of Hogansville, 202 Ga. App. 131, 413 S.E.2d 457 (1991).

Cleaning of streets and removal of garbage therefrom and from residences abutting on streets and sidewalks are governmental functions in the performance of which the municipality incurs no liability for the acts of the municipality's officers and employees. City of Brunswick v. Volpain, 67 Ga. App. 654, 21 S.E.2d 442 (1942).

Removal of debris from streets - City is in exercise of governmental function in removing "sweepings" from streets for the reason that such act is conducive to the good health of the community and the public at large. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934).

Operation of toll bridge is ministerial function. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934).

Fire hose lying on street part of performance of governmental function. - When city's fire department was engaged in extinguishing a fire when plaintiff motorcyclist was injured by running into a fire hose lying on the street, the employees and agents of the defendant city were engaged in a governmental function to the extent that the defendant is not liable in damages for the fire department's negligent acts. Clay v. City of Rome, 74 Ga. App. 754, 41 S.E.2d 337 (1947).

Inconsistent charter provision of no use as defense. - Insofar as charter provisions relieved a city from liability for negligence in the maintenance of the city's streets, such provision was inconsistent with general law of force and effect in the state, and the inhibition contained in the state Constitution against the passage of special laws in conflict with existing general law precluded raising of such charter provisions as a defense to personal injury action against the city. City of Macon v. Harrison, 98 Ga. App. 769, 106 S.E.2d 833 (1958).

Relief of abutting property owner from liability. - Placing of responsibility upon municipalities relieves an abutting property owner of liability unless the owner caused or actively participated in causing the obstruction or defect in the street or sidewalk. Reed v. Batson-Cook Co., 122 Ga. App. 803, 178 S.E.2d 728 (1970).

Tree limb crashing on pedestrian. - City was not entitled to summary judgment on the pedestrian's claims for injuries suffered when a tree limb crashed on the pedestrian as the pedestrian walked on a city street because maintenance of the streets was a ministerial duty, O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(b), required by O.C.G.A. § 32-4-93(a), and there was evidence that the tree was visibly decayed or dying. City of Fitzgerald v. Caruthers, 332 Ga. App. 731, 774 S.E.2d 777 (2015).

City could be liable for dock collapse, but had no notice of any defect. - Although a city could be liable under O.C.G.A. § 32-4-93(a) for failure to maintain a dock that collapsed, injuring the plaintiffs, because the dock fell within the definition of "public road" in O.C.G.A. § 32-1-3, there was no evidence that the city had notice of any defect in the dock, and the plaintiffs' expert affidavit did not identify any defect. Therefore, the city was properly granted summary judgment on immunity grounds. Chatham Area Transit Auth. v. Brantley, 353 Ga. App. 197, 834 S.E.2d 593 (2019).

Defect is question for jury. - Whether a defect or hole in a city street was such as to give a right of action to a person injured thereby is ordinarily a question for the jury, since it is a complicated question of fact involving the depth of the hole or defect, the hole's appearance to travelers on the street, and the danger which might have been anticipated and guarded against by the city in the exercise of reasonable forethought. Mayor of Buford v. Medley, 58 Ga. App. 48, 197 S.E. 494 (1938).

Whether by the existence of a defect in a street or sidewalk such street or sidewalk was not in a reasonably safe condition, and whether the city knew or ought to have known of the defect in time to repair the defect, or give warning of the defect's existence, are ordinarily questions for determination by a jury. McKay v. City of Atlanta, 80 Ga. App. 797, 57 S.E.2d 432 (1950).

Sewers

Collection and disposition of sewerage is a governmental function, and there is accordingly no cause of action for the improper erection and maintenance of a sewer on the theory of negligence alone, because damage resulting from the exercise of a governmental function in a negligent manner would constitute damnum absque injuria. Ingram v. City of Acworth, 90 Ga. App. 719, 84 S.E.2d 99 (1954).

Sewers as governmental function. - Duties of municipal authorities in adopting a general plan of drainage, and in determining when, where, and of what size, and at what level drains or sewers shall be built, are of a quasi-judicial nature, involving the exercise of deliberate judgment and wide discretion; and the municipality is not liable for an error of judgment on the part of the authorities in locating or planning such improvements. City of Atlanta v. Trussell, 21 Ga. App. 340, 94 S.E. 649 (1917); Harrison Co. v. City of Atlanta, 26 Ga. App. 727, 107 S.E. 83 (1921); Rogers v. City of Atlanta, 61 Ga. App. 444, 6 S.E.2d 144 (1939).

Construction, installation, and maintenance of a sewer-drainage system (including that for surface water) is a governmental function. Foster v. Crowder, 117 Ga. App. 568, 161 S.E.2d 364 (1968); Turk v. City of Rome, 133 Ga. App. 886, 212 S.E.2d 459, aff'd, 235 Ga. 223, 219 S.E.2d 97 (1975); Pair Dev. Co. v. City of Atlanta, 144 Ga. App. 239, 240 S.E.2d 897 (1977); City of E. Point v. Terhune, 144 Ga. App. 865, 242 S.E.2d 728 (1978).

Construction and maintenance of sewers is a ministerial duty. Mayor of Savannah v. Spears, 66 Ga. 304 (1881); Smith v. City of Atlanta, 75 Ga. 110 (1885); City of Atlanta v. Trussell, 21 Ga. App. 340, 94 S.E. 649 (1917).

Nuisance theory liability. - Power to construct a system of sewers and drains does not authorize the municipal corporation to create a nuisance. In such a case the city cannot escape liability on the ground that the city is engaged in the performance of a governmental function. Cannon v. City of Macon, 81 Ga. App. 310, 58 S.E.2d 563 (1950), later appeal, 89 Ga. App. 484, 79 S.E.2d 816 (1954); Ingram v. City of Acworth, 90 Ga. App. 719, 84 S.E.2d 99 (1954).

Even though the construction, installation, and maintenance of a sewer-drainage system, including that for surface water, is a governmental function, a municipal corporation can nevertheless be held liable with respect to these activities on the theory of nuisance and on the theory of taking or damaging for public purposes without just and adequate compensation being first paid. Turk v. City of Rome, 133 Ga. App. 886, 212 S.E.2d 459, aff'd, 235 Ga. 223, 219 S.E.2d 97 (1975).

Trial court erred by granting summary judgment to a city on a property owner's nuisance claim because evidence existed that the property had been subjected to repeated flooding and that the city had notice of the problem, creating a jury issue as to whether the city had created a nuisance by failing to install a back flow preventer as the city had done for other properties. J. N. Legacy Group v. City of Dallas, 322 Ga. App. 475, 745 S.E.2d 721 (2013).

Sufficiency of petition. - When the gist of the action was negligence and not nuisance, and the only act of negligence alleged in the petition was that the opening in the sewerage system of the city was too small, and the petition did not allege any negligent construction or negligent failure to keep in repair or maintain the sewer or the sewer's inlet, or negligence in allowing the sewer to become obstructed, this was merely alleging an error in the planning of a drainage system and that this act caused the injury. No actionable negligence was alleged, and the municipality was not liable for the judgment on the part of the authorities in locating or planning a general plan of drainage sewers for the city. Rogers v. City of Atlanta, 61 Ga. App. 444, 6 S.E.2d 144 (1939).

Transportation

Airport as park. - Airport of the City of Savannah, under the statutes (both local and general) authorizing the airport's establishment and maintenance, was a governmental institution in the nature of a "park," and the city was not liable in damages to a party sustaining personal injuries by reason of a dangerous defect in the pavement of a roadway inside the "park," notwithstanding receipt by the city of some incidental revenue from lessees or licensees of certain privileges therein, it not appearing that the airport was operated primarily as a source of revenue. Mayor of Savannah v. Lyons, 54 Ga. App. 661, 189 S.E. 63 (1936).

Operation of a municipal airport when portions are leased for "substantial revenue" is a ministerial or proprietary function of the city. Hence, a municipality is not immune from liability resulting from the municipality's negligence in the maintenance and operation thereof. Caroway v. City of Atlanta, 85 Ga. App. 792, 70 S.E.2d 126 (1952); Taylor v. King, 104 Ga. App. 589, 122 S.E.2d 265 (1961). For comment on Caroway v. City of Atlanta, see 5 Ga. St. B. J. 474 (1969).

Use of motor vehicles. - Governmental immunity from liability extends to the use of motor vehicles in connection with the performance or accomplishment of the governmental function. Foster v. Crowder, 117 Ga. App. 568, 161 S.E.2d 364 (1968).

Bus system. - In operating a system of buses for the transportation of passengers for hire, a city functions in a corporate, as distinguished from a governmental capacity, and may be held liable for injuries sustained through the negligent operation of a bus. Columbus v. Hadley, 130 Ga. App. 599, 203 S.E.2d 872 (1974).

City is liable as a common carrier with respect to passengers, and is required to exercise a high degree of care for passenger safety, not only while being transported, but also when entering the vehicle, or alighting therefrom. Columbus v. Hadley, 130 Ga. App. 599, 203 S.E.2d 872 (1974).

Need to prove negligence caused injury to passengers. - Recovery against the city will be denied if the evidence is insufficient to prove negligence on the part of a bus driver. Columbus v. Hadley, 130 Ga. App. 599, 203 S.E.2d 872 (1974).

Municipality is not an insurer of the safety of the municipality's passengers, and ordinarily is not liable for damages resulting from sudden stops, or jerks or jolts of the vehicle, nor for unusual conditions on streets or sidewalks, unless municipal negligence is established. As to persons other than passengers, such as pedestrians, or motorists, ordinary care is required in the operation of buses. Columbus v. Hadley, 130 Ga. App. 599, 203 S.E.2d 872 (1974).

Liability to police officer for defective motorcycle. - Defendant municipality is not liable for the negligence of the municipality's chief of police in failing to furnish a police officer with a good motorcycle since at the time of the injury the municipality was in the exercise of a governmental function. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934).

Other Duties

Preservation of public health is a governmental function and involves the removal of those causes which are calculated to produce disease. Mitchell v. City of St. Marys, 155 Ga. App. 642, 271 S.E.2d 895 (1980).

Violation by city of own ordinance. - Court did not err in charging that the violation by a city of the city's own ordinance calling for safety shut-off devices on gas appliances would constitute negligence per se since the city was engaged in supplying gas and had undertaken to convert customers' appliances to the use of propane. City of Albany v. Burt, 88 Ga. App. 144, 76 S.E.2d 413 (1953).

Wall abutting on or nearby a public street may be torn down by the municipality if the wall is dangerous to the public, but if this be done summarily, it is at the peril of the city. If the wall is not in fact dangerous, the city will be liable. McWilliams v. City of Rome, 142 Ga. 848, 83 S.E. 945 (1914).

Collection and transportation of garbage by a city employee is a governmental function. Boone v. City of Columbus, 87 Ga. App. 701, 75 S.E.2d 338 (1953).

Removal of garbage from residences, the transportation thereof to a point of disposal and the disposal, when performed by a municipality, or an agency thereof, is a governmental function in the performance of which a city incurs no liability for the negligent acts of the city's officers and employees. Ethridge v. City of Lavonia, 101 Ga. App. 190, 112 S.E.2d 822 (1960). For comment, see 23 Ga. B. J. 129 (1960).

Generally, removal of garbage and trash and other health and sanitation measures protecting the health and welfare of the public are considered governmental functions, but cleaning up the street in a "cleanup campaign" might include both health and sanitation, as well as maintaining streets and sidewalks to keep the streets and sidewalks safe for travel, which is a ministerial function. City of Atlanta v. Whatley, 161 Ga. App. 705, 289 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

When city admitted that the city was remunerated for sanitation and trash pick-up and could have used a portion of the revenues derived from such a source to finance in part other city operations, the pick-up activity may have become a quasi-public business, a ministerial function, by becoming a "source of revenue" instead of "a purely incidental profit." City of Atlanta v. Whatley, 161 Ga. App. 705, 289 S.E.2d 541 (1982).

Garbage as nuisance. - Although municipal authorities may have plenary power in the matter of collection, removal, and disposition of garbage, yet the municipal authorities cannot lawfully create, in connection therewith, a nuisance dangerous to health or life; and when such a nuisance is created, and the effect is specially injurious to an individual by reason of the nuisance's proximity to an individual's home, the individual has a cause of action for damages. City of Atlanta v. Due, 42 Ga. App. 797, 157 S.E. 256 (1931).

Housing authority created under statutory authorization was business enterprise, and hence municipality was liable in tort to tenant. Knowles v. Housing Auth., 212 Ga. 729, 95 S.E.2d 659 (1956). For comment, see 20 Ga. B. J. 258 (1957).

Wrongful refusal of bail. - City was not liable in damages because mayor, as judge of city's court for the trial of ordinance violations, wrongfully refused to allow bail to an alleged offender, and wrongfully directed a police officer to commit the offender to jail, where the offender was imprisoned until released by a habeas corpus proceeding, nor did the appearance of the mayor or an attorney for the municipality in resistance of the habeas corpus constitute a ratification by the municipality of these alleged illegal acts by the municipality's officers so as to render the municipality liable therefore. Brown v. City of Union Point, 52 Ga. App. 212, 183 S.E. 78 (1935).

City cemetery. - When none but those who pay for easements in city-owned cemetery are permitted to use the cemetery as such (that is, those who buy lots therein), the sphere of the cemetery's operation is so contracted as to exclude the general public from the use of the cemetery for cemetery purposes, and thus, even if a few paupers are buried there without paying therefor, the city is engaged in the performance of a ministerial function and not a governmental function, and is liable for negligence in connection therewith. City of Atlanta v. Rich, 64 Ga. App. 193, 12 S.E.2d 436 (1940), distinguished, Mayor of Savannah v. Radford, 261 Ga. 129, 401 S.E.2d 709 (1991).

Wastepaper box. - Maintenance by a municipality of a large wastepaper wooden box as a receptacle for trash and wastepaper and the removal of the box's contents is an act by a municipality in the performance of the municipality's governmental functions. Mayor of Savannah v. Jones, 149 Ga. 139, 99 S.E. 294 (1919).

Uninsulated live wire. - In suit by telephone cable repairer, against telephone company and city, for injuries sustained by coming into contact with uninsulated live wire of city, strung in close proximity to pole of defendant telephone company, while repairing cable on that pole, the petition set out no cause of action where it appeared that the plaintiff could have avoided injury by the exercise of ordinary care. Elder v. City of Quitman, 56 Ga. App. 460, 193 S.E. 82 (1937).

Manufacture and installation of sanitary toilets by a municipality for the municipality's citizens is an act tending to promote the health and general welfare of the municipality's citizens, and is in its nature a governmental function. Watkins v. City of Toccoa, 55 Ga. App. 8, 189 S.E. 270 (1936).

When an airport security officer employed by the city had the powers of a police officer and fire fighter and was involved in an automobile accident while performing those duties, the city is immune from liability. City of Macon v. Powell, 133 Ga. App. 907, 213 S.E.2d 63 (1975).

Fire department. - Operation and maintenance of fire departments and apparatus therein is a governmental function of the municipality and, therefore, the municipality is not liable for negligence of the municipality's officers or agents incident to such function. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934); Banks v. City of Albany, 83 Ga. App. 640, 64 S.E.2d 93 (1951).

Injuries to fire fighter. - When a municipal corporation maintains a firehouse and on the second floor of the building maintains sleeping quarters for attending fire fighters, and when the municipality maintains in the building a pole extending from the fire fighter's quarters to the first floor which is used in responding to fire alarms, the municipality is engaged in the exercise of a governmental power in maintaining such pole and the floor on which the pole rests, and is not liable in damages to a fire fighter for injuries while using the pole for the purpose for which the pole was intended, on account of negligence in the maintenance of the pole and floor. Miller v. City of Macon, 152 Ga. 648, 110 S.E. 873 (1922).

Fact that a police officer was patrolling property operated by the municipality for private gain and profit would not affect the character of the police officer's act and the consequent liability of the city. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934).

Municipality not liable for negligence of leader of work gang when prisoner injured as a result. City of Atlanta v. Hurley, 83 Ga. App. 879, 65 S.E.2d 44 (1951). For comment, see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 218 (1951) and 14 Ga. B. J. 80 (1951).

Erection and maintenance of a city prison by a municipal corporation is a governmental function. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934).

In erecting and maintaining a city prison for a police station, a municipal corporation is exercising a purely governmental function and is, therefore, not liable in damages to a person arrested and imprisoned therein by the municipality's police officers for injuries sustained by the person while so confined by reason of the improper construction or negligent maintenance of such prison or station. McDay v. City of Atlanta, 204 Ga. App. 621, 420 S.E.2d 75, cert. denied, 204 Ga. App. 922, 420 S.E.2d 75 (1992).

Maintenance of a jail by a municipality is a governmental function, and the municipality is not liable for injury to a prisoner resulting entirely from the negligent maintenance and keeping of the prison. Archer v. City of Austell, 68 Ga. App. 493, 23 S.E.2d 512 (1942).

Jail conditions. - Because a city was immune from suit in performing the governmental function of maintaining the city jail, it could not be concluded as a matter of law, in a federal civil rights action against the city and the city's police officers, alleging that the physical conditions in the jail deprived the defendant of due process, that "adequate state remedies" existed. Lambert v. McFarland, 612 F. Supp. 1252 (N.D. Ga. 1984).

Operation of a system of waterworks is not such a governmental function that a city is not liable for injuries resulting through negligence in the maintenance thereof. Huey v. City of Atlanta, 8 Ga. App. 597, 70 S.E. 71 (1911).

City maintenance of drainage culverts. - In a father's suit alleging that a city was negligent in maintenance of a drainage culvert in which the father's son drowned, the father's argument that the city waived the city's sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a) was treated as abandoned on the city's motion for summary judgment because the father did not address the city's sovereign immunity claim in the brief in opposition to the motion. Walden v. City of Hawkinsville, F.3d (M.D. Ga. Sept. 21, 2005).

City immune for operation of a fountain. - City was entitled to sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 32-4-93 in a pedestrian's claim against the city for negligent maintenance of a fountain, which the pedestrian argued resulted in ice forming on a sidewalk where the pedestrian slipped and fell. The pedestrian failed to point to specific evidence of the city's actual or constructive notice of any defect in the fountain. Naraine v. City of Atlanta, 306 Ga. App. 561, 703 S.E.2d 31 (2010).

Operation of parking meters on the streets of a municipality with charter powers sufficiently broad to invest it with the general supervision and control over its street is a governmental function. Stubbs v. City of Macon, 78 Ga. App. 237, 50 S.E.2d 866 (1948).

Operation of electric power plant a ministerial function. - Under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1, a municipal corporation is liable for improper performance of the municipality's ministerial duties, but not for errors in exercising the municipality's judicial or governmental powers, and the operation of an electric power plant for profit is a ministerial function. City of Douglas v. Johnson, 157 Ga. App. 618, 278 S.E.2d 160 (1981).

Licensing power. - When a municipal or other governmental body grants a license it is an adjudication that the applicant has satisfactorily complied with the prescribed standards for the award of that license. Similarly the denial of a license is based on an adjudication that the applicant has not satisfied those qualifications and requirements. On the other hand, the prescription of standards which must be met to obtain a license is legislation, since these standards are authoritative guides for future conduct derived from an assessment of the needs of the community. A governmental agency entrusted with the licensing power, therefore, functions as a legislature when the agency prescribes these standards, but the same agency acts as a judicial body when the agency makes a determination that a specific applicant has or has not satisfied the requirements. 106 Forsyth Corp. v. Bishop, 362 F. Supp. 1389 (M.D. Ga. 1972), aff'd, 482 F.2d 280 (5th Cir. 1973), cert. denied, 422 U.S. 1044, 95 S. Ct. 2660, 45 L. Ed. 2d 696 (1975).

Requirements of due process applicable to licensing power. - Since licensing consists in the determination of factual issues and the application of legal criteria to the licensing - a judicial act - the fundamental requirements of due process are applicable to it. 106 Forsyth Corp. v. Bishop, 362 F. Supp. 1389 (M.D. Ga. 1972), aff'd, 482 F.2d 280 (5th Cir. 1973), cert. denied, 422 U.S. 1044, 95 S. Ct. 2660, 45 L. Ed. 2d 696 (1975).

City immune for clerk's action of issuing a business license. - Suit by parents against a city alleging that the city negligently issued a day care business license to a day care, which left their child in a hot car, resulting in the child's death, was barred by sovereign immunity because the issuance of a license was a government function. Calloway v. City of Warner Robins, 336 Ga. App. 714, 783 S.E.2d 175 (2016).

Waiver in 1983 pursuant to state constitution. - Despite the language limiting O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a)'s effect to litigation pending after July 1, 1986, a municipality's defense of sovereign immunity is automatically waived to the extent of any applicable general liability insurance coverage carried by the municipality for actions filed as of the effective date in 1983 of Ga. Const., 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX. Brockman v. Burnette, 184 Ga. App. 66, 360 S.E.2d 655 (1987).

When plaintiff failed to furnish an insurance policy which was allegedly purchased by the city, it could not have been determined whether the policy covered an occurrence for which the defense of sovereign immunity was available, and whether the city waived the city's immunity for any tort which may have been committed by one of the city's officers. Hancock v. Hobbs, 967 F.2d 462 (11th Cir. 1992).

Indemnification agreement with railroad. - When the city entered into agreements with the railroad to utilize a right-of-way for water and sewer lines, and an accident later subjected the railroad to damages, and claims by third parties, because nothing in O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1 could be construed to permit a municipality to waive its sovereign immunity by contracting to indemnify a third party, the indemnification agreement between the city and the railroad was void as an ultra vires contract. Under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a), it was the purchase of insurance that effectuated the waiver of sovereign immunity; thus, it was irrelevant that the invalid indemnification agreement covered occurrences to which sovereign immunity both did and did not apply. CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 277 Ga. 248, 588 S.E.2d 688 (2003).

In an action by a rail corporation for indemnification resulting from a collision between a train and a truck operated by a city's construction contractor, the rail corporation could not use an insurance provision in a contract with the city permitting use of the railroad's right-of-way to bootstrap an unpleaded tort claim when, under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1, the city had waived the city's sovereign immunity to the extent that the city had purchased liability insurance so that the indemnification provision had no effect and the railroads had abandoned the railroad's contract claim. CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, F.3d (11th Cir. Dec. 10, 2007)(Unpublished).

Indemnification contracts. - City was entitled to summary judgment on plaintiffs' contract claim against the city since the indemnification contract between the city and the plaintiffs was ultra vires. CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 196 F. Supp. 2d 1288 (S.D. Ga. 2002).

Surety sued a city after the cash bond the surety posted was forfeited. As the traffic court was operating in the court's judicial capacity when the court ordered the forfeiture of the bond, the court's actions were immune from liability under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(b). Watts v. City of Dillard, 294 Ga. App. 861, 670 S.E.2d 442 (2008).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Generally, counties have a broader immunity from suits than do municipalities. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-32.

Keeping of prisoners by a city is ordinarily a governmental function, and for simple negligence in such a function a city is not liable. 1973 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U73-25.

Municipality's potential liability for acts of a probationer working on a community service project will have to be determined from the facts in each case, which will show whether the injury is the result of a nuisance as defined in former Code 1933, § 72-101 (see now O.C.G.A. § 41-1-1), or negligence as stated in former Code 1933, § 69-301 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1). 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-32.

School athletic activities. - Local school district is not liable in tort under the law of Georgia for injuries sustained by a pupil engaged in school athletic activities. 1957 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 100.

Board not liable for accident while transporting pupil to athletic event. - Use of a school bus for transporting a school band and school pupils of an independent school system to athletic contests participated in by the schools of the district would be a governmental operation and a city board of education is not liable for an injury received by a pupil in a school bus accident. 1945-47 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 220.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 882.

ALR. - Suit against railroad owned by or in which interest is held by United States or state, 8 A.L.R. 995.

Liability of town or municipality for libel or slander, 9 A.L.R. 351.

Liability of water or power company for interruption of pressure during progress of fire, 27 A.L.R. 1273.

Statutory requirement of adequate service and facilities by public utility as affecting liability for loss of private property through inadequate supply of water to extinguish fire, 27 A.L.R. 1279.

Liability of municipal corporation for tort of officer or employee of water department, 28 A.L.R. 822; 54 A.L.R. 1497.

Liability of municipal corporations for injuries due to conditions in parks, 29 A.L.R. 863; 42 A.L.R. 263; 99 A.L.R. 686; 142 A.L.R. 1340.

Commission and other modern forms of municipal government as affecting liability of municipality for torts, 30 A.L.R. 473.

Liability of municipality for tort in construction or operation of municipally owned railroad or street railway, 31 A.L.R. 1306.

Liability in respect of taxes derived from territory improperly annexed to municipal or political division, 35 A.L.R. 477.

Validity of contract exempting municipality from liability for negligence, 41 A.L.R. 1358.

Liability of municipality as affected by license issued by municipal officer, 42 A.L.R. 1208.

Liability of municipality for damages or compensation for abating as a nuisance what is not in fact such, 46 A.L.R. 362.

Liability of municipality in respect of municipal bathhouses, bathing beaches, and swimming pools, 51 A.L.R. 370; 57 A.L.R. 406.

Liability of municipality in consequence of its inability, refusal, or failure to collect the cost of local improvements from the property benefited, 51 A.L.R. 973; 172 A.L.R. 1030.

Liability of municipal corporations and their licensees for the torts of independent contractors, 52 A.L.R. 1012.

Liability of municipality in damages for wrongful revocation of permit or license, 55 A.L.R. 434.

Rule of municipal immunity from liability for torts pertaining to governmental functions as affected by constitutional guaranty of remedy for all injuries and wrongs, 57 A.L.R. 419.

Rule of municipal immunity from liability for torts pertaining to exercise of governmental functions as available to municipal lessee or concessioner, 57 A.L.R. 560.

Liability of county or municipality for tortious injury in or about building which is used for both governmental and proprietary functions, 64 A.L.R. 1545.

Liability of municipality where sewer originally of ample size has become inadequate by growth or development of territory, 70 A.L.R. 1347.

Liability of municipality for injury due to defective catch-basin covers, and the like, maintained in street in connection with drainage or sewer system, 71 A.L.R. 753.

Res ipsa loquitur as applicable in action against municipality for injuries from dangerous condition in parks, streets, or highways, 74 A.L.R. 1226.

Rule of municipal immunity from liability for acts in performance of governmental functions as applicable in case of personal injury or death as result of a nuisance, 75 A.L.R. 1196; 56 A.L.R.2d 1415.

Fire department as pertaining to the governmental or the proprietary branch of municipality, 84 A.L.R. 514.

Constitutionality or validity of statute or ordinance requiring a bond to discharge liability for damage as a condition of use of, or operations on, real property, 86 A.L.R. 803.

Applicability to federal courts of state constitutional or statutory provisions regarding liability of county or other political subdivision to suit, 86 A.L.R. 1019.

Power of legislature to impose, or municipality to assume, liability for acts of officials or employees pertaining to governmental functions, 89 A.L.R. 394.

Right to and remedy in respect of damages due to negligent or delayed prosecution of condemnation proceedings, 92 A.L.R. 379.

Liability of municipality for injury by or incident to fireworks display, 93 A.L.R. 1356.

Liability of municipal corporation for its own misfeasance or nonfeasance, as distinguished from misfeasance or nonfeasance of officer or employee, 102 A.L.R. 656.

Power of city, town, or county or its officials to compromise claim, 105 A.L.R. 170; 15 A.L.R.2d 1359.

Liability of municipality because of misappropriation, diversion, or withholding of funds collected by or paid to it on account of special assessment against property for improvements, 107 A.L.R. 1354.

When statute of limitation commences to run against an action based on breach of duty by recording officer, 110 A.L.R. 1067.
